dict-sa-Deva/sa-Deva.aff
FLAG NUM
SFX 3846 Y 1
SFX 3846 0 मुखान् .
SFX 3340 Y 1
SFX 3340 0 मुखात् .
SFX 4180 Y 1
SFX 4180 0 धरैः .
SFX 1982 Y 1
SFX 1982 0 यिष्यता .
SFX 1976 Y 1
SFX 1976 0 यिष्यती .
SFX 2426 Y 1
SFX 2426 0 इनाम् .
SFX 478 Y 1
SFX 478 0 यताम् .
SFX 946 Y 1
SFX 946 0 माणायाम् .
SFX 2112 Y 1
SFX 2112 0 यमाणेभ्यः .
SFX 367 Y 1
SFX 367 0 मानासु .
SFX 719 Y 1
SFX 719 0 नीय .
SFX 784 Y 1
SFX 784 0 नीये .
SFX 3237 Y 1
SFX 3237 0 फलम् .
SFX 191 Y 1
SFX 191 0 ध्वे .
SFX 1286 Y 1
SFX 1286 0 इतव्यासु .
SFX 4232 Y 1
SFX 4232 0 णाभिः .
SFX 1800 Y 1
SFX 1800 0 अकेभ्यः .
SFX 762 Y 1
SFX 762 0 यमानाभ्याम् .
SFX 4619 Y 1
SFX 4619 0 ष्यः .
SFX 88 Y 1
SFX 88 0 ध्वम् .
SFX 1612 Y 1
SFX 1612 0 यद्भ्याम् .
SFX 4924 Y 1
SFX 4924 0 इकाय .
SFX 2151 Y 1
SFX 2151 0 यमाणायाः .
SFX 4183 Y 1
SFX 4183 0 वन .
SFX 3545 Y 1
SFX 3545 0 वने .
SFX 4599 Y 1
SFX 4599 0 षतः .
SFX 3620 Y 1
SFX 3620 0 करणाभ्याम् .
SFX 4921 Y 1
SFX 4921 0 लिभिः .
SFX 4714 Y 1
SFX 4714 0 काम .
SFX 3853 Y 1
SFX 3853 0 दीपिकानाम् .
SFX 4710 Y 1
SFX 4710 0 ल्यै .
SFX 4709 Y 1
SFX 4709 0 ल्यौ .
SFX 2312 Y 1
SFX 2312 0 टाभ्याम् .
SFX 3248 Y 1
SFX 3248 0 कारेभ्यः .
SFX 251 Y 1
SFX 251 0 आय .
SFX 3520 Y 1
SFX 3520 0 स्तोत्रैः .
SFX 3902 Y 1
SFX 3902 0 थेषु .
SFX 3858 Y 1
SFX 3858 0 र्मम् .
SFX 3779 Y 1
SFX 3779 0 र्मन् .
SFX 4529 Y 1
SFX 4529 0 दत्तानाम् .
SFX 1502 Y 1
SFX 1502 0 इष्यध्वे .
SFX 2650 Y 1
SFX 2650 0 अयेथाम् .
SFX 2511 Y 1
SFX 2511 0 अयन्तीम् .
SFX 1797 Y 1
SFX 1797 0 मयैः .
SFX 3615 Y 1
SFX 3615 0 क्षयोः .
SFX 2045 Y 1
SFX 2045 0 यिष्यमाणैः .
SFX 670 Y 1
SFX 670 0 व्येन .
SFX 2479 Y 1
SFX 2479 0 अयितास्मः .
SFX 3148 Y 1
SFX 3148 0 पाः .
SFX 4277 Y 1
SFX 4277 0 नाथाय .
SFX 2067 Y 1
SFX 2067 0 णीभ्यः .
SFX 4920 Y 1
SFX 4920 0 लिभ्यः .
SFX 1652 Y 1
SFX 1652 0 अमानासु .
SFX 3861 Y 1
SFX 3861 0 प्रकाशानाम् .
SFX 3596 Y 1
SFX 3596 0 सङ्ग्रहाभ्याम् .
SFX 227 Y 1
SFX 227 0 स्थ .
SFX 3843 Y 1
SFX 3843 0 स्थे .
SFX 1647 Y 1
SFX 1647 0 आणा .
SFX 3063 Y 1
SFX 3063 0 इकायै .
SFX 2999 Y 1
SFX 2999 0 हैः .
SFX 1655 Y 1
SFX 1655 0 अमानाभिः .
SFX 213 Y 1
SFX 213 0 स्व .
SFX 2562 Y 1
SFX 2562 0 अयिष्यन्तीम् .
SFX 3392 Y 1
SFX 3392 0 पद्धत्याः .
SFX 3171 Y 1
SFX 3171 0 अमाणयोः .
SFX 2959 Y 1
SFX 2959 0 आहात्म्यात् .
SFX 2490 Y 1
SFX 2490 0 सोः .
SFX 4910 Y 1
SFX 4910 0 रहस्याय .
SFX 2519 Y 1
SFX 2519 0 भाव .
SFX 2771 Y 1
SFX 2771 0 भावे .
SFX 1078 Y 1
SFX 1078 0 ईयतः .
SFX 1151 Y 1
SFX 1151 0 कानि .
SFX 2750 Y 1
SFX 2750 0 भू .
SFX 4676 Y 1
SFX 4676 0 र्थाय .
SFX 2133 Y 1
SFX 2133 0 ष्यामि .
SFX 2380 Y 1
SFX 2380 0 इनम् .
SFX 2388 Y 1
SFX 2388 0 इनौ .
SFX 1619 Y 1
SFX 1619 0 यन्तः .
SFX 133 Y 1
SFX 133 0 है .
SFX 2770 Y 1
SFX 2770 0 हम् .
SFX 3901 Y 1
SFX 3901 0 हन् .
SFX 2756 Y 1
SFX 2756 0 हौ .
SFX 2198 Y 1
SFX 2198 0 ष्यमाणेन .
SFX 3078 Y 1
SFX 3078 0 तीर्थस्य .
SFX 1749 Y 1
SFX 1749 0 येयुः .
SFX 1268 Y 1
SFX 1268 0 एथाम् .
SFX 2081 Y 1
SFX 2081 0 कृतः .
SFX 1125 Y 1
SFX 1125 0 अन्तीम् .
SFX 363 Y 1
SFX 363 0 मानायाम् .
SFX 3205 Y 1
SFX 3205 0 अमाणानि .
SFX 970 Y 1
SFX 970 0 नीयासु .
SFX 2735 Y 1
SFX 2735 0 अयेध्वम् .
SFX 1511 Y 1
SFX 1511 0 इतवत्याम् .
SFX 4634 Y 1
SFX 4634 0 क्याः .
SFX 2512 Y 1
SFX 2512 0 अयन्तीः .
SFX 3883 Y 1
SFX 3883 0 प्रकाशेभ्यः .
SFX 1261 Y 1
SFX 1261 0 नीभ्यः .
SFX 568 Y 1
SFX 568 0 आनतः .
SFX 2427 Y 1
SFX 2427 0 इकाभ्याम् .
SFX 1965 Y 1
SFX 1965 0 यितव्यासु .
SFX 1989 Y 1
SFX 1989 0 यिष्यन्त्यः .
SFX 3731 Y 1
SFX 3731 0 भूततः .
SFX 3681 Y 1
SFX 3681 0 हुः .
SFX 406 Y 1
SFX 406 0 नेन .
SFX 1513 Y 1
SFX 1513 0 इतवत्याः .
SFX 481 Y 1
SFX 481 0 इतः .
SFX 3934 Y 1
SFX 3934 0 वादस्य .
SFX 3028 Y 1
SFX 3028 0 माहात्म्याभ्याम् .
SFX 3765 Y 1
SFX 3765 0 पुत्र .
SFX 3924 Y 1
SFX 3924 0 पुत्रे .
SFX 2866 Y 1
SFX 2866 0 त्य .
SFX 4958 Y 1
SFX 4958 0 त्ये .
SFX 1765 Y 1
SFX 1765 0 अकयोः .
SFX 2856 Y 1
SFX 2856 0 तारम् .
SFX 1424 Y 1
SFX 1424 0 तारौ .
SFX 1656 Y 1
SFX 1656 0 आणायाम् .
SFX 2251 Y 1
SFX 2251 0 मयेन .
SFX 3494 Y 1
SFX 3494 0 तमयोः .
SFX 4739 Y 1
SFX 4739 0 र्थात् .
SFX 3658 Y 1
SFX 3658 0 मनाम् .
SFX 2474 Y 1
SFX 2474 0 अयन्तः .
SFX 3058 Y 1
SFX 3058 0 श्वरैः .
SFX 4388 Y 1
SFX 4388 0 भृतम् .
SFX 4351 Y 1
SFX 4351 0 भृतौ .
SFX 1281 Y 1
SFX 1281 0 एध्वम् .
SFX 1382 Y 1
SFX 1382 0 अनीयासु .
SFX 3577 Y 1
SFX 3577 0 तमस्य .
SFX 3044 Y 1
SFX 3044 0 इकाभ्यः .
SFX 3101 Y 1
SFX 3101 0 अयमानायाम् .
SFX 4733 Y 1
SFX 4733 0 रूपस्य .
SFX 1940 Y 1
SFX 1940 0 यितुम् .
SFX 1147 Y 1
SFX 1147 0 न्याः .
SFX 4732 Y 1
SFX 4732 0 रूपात् .
SFX 3330 Y 1
SFX 3330 0 पस्य .
SFX 2661 Y 1
SFX 2661 0 पतेः .
SFX 2226 Y 1
SFX 2226 0 ष्यमाणया .
SFX 3639 Y 1
SFX 3639 0 करणैः .
SFX 3004 Y 1
SFX 3004 0 मने .
SFX 2873 Y 1
SFX 2873 0 मनि .
SFX 2105 Y 1
SFX 2105 0 ष्यन्तम् .
SFX 2104 Y 1
SFX 2104 0 ष्यन्तौ .
SFX 780 Y 1
SFX 780 0 यमानासु .
SFX 4612 Y 1
SFX 4612 0 धाभ्याम् .
SFX 4407 Y 1
SFX 4407 0 वनेषु .
SFX 4746 Y 1
SFX 4746 0 ज्ञाय .
SFX 2548 Y 1
SFX 2548 0 अयिष्यतम् .
SFX 4681 Y 1
SFX 4681 0 कल्पेषु .
SFX 3838 Y 1
SFX 3838 0 वृत्तिभिः .
SFX 2141 Y 1
SFX 2141 0 णीयया .
SFX 1066 Y 1
SFX 1066 0 राय .
SFX 433 Y 1
SFX 433 0 न्तीः .
SFX 1456 Y 1
SFX 1456 0 इतवद्भ्यः .
SFX 2219 Y 1
SFX 2219 0 शाभ्याम् .
SFX 4897 Y 1
SFX 4897 0 स्थानैः .
SFX 3892 Y 1
SFX 3892 0 प्रकाशः .
SFX 1736 Y 1
SFX 1736 0 अयेषु .
SFX 898 Y 1
SFX 898 0 अनयोः .
SFX 790 Y 1
SFX 790 0 नीयेभ्यः .
SFX 1330 Y 1
SFX 1330 0 इष्यतः .
SFX 3776 Y 1
SFX 3776 0 त्रात् .
SFX 2360 Y 1
SFX 2360 0 कराः .
SFX 4857 Y 1
SFX 4857 0 ङ्गानाम् .
SFX 2644 Y 1
SFX 2644 0 अणम् .
SFX 4401 Y 1
SFX 4401 0 अणौ .
SFX 4604 Y 1
SFX 4604 0 क्तौ .
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 0 या .
SFX 4344 Y 1
SFX 4344 0 पदात् .
SFX 3559 Y 1
SFX 3559 0 क्षतः .
SFX 2518 Y 1
SFX 2518 0 ःसु .
SFX 2405 Y 1
SFX 2405 0 अयितव्याभ्याम् .
SFX 3737 Y 1
SFX 3737 0 ष .
SFX 2148 Y 1
SFX 2148 0 षे .
SFX 3218 Y 1
SFX 3218 0 षि .
SFX 4 Y 1
SFX 4 0 षु .
SFX 3163 Y 1
SFX 3163 0 गम् .
SFX 3139 Y 1
SFX 3139 0 गौ .
SFX 4645 Y 1
SFX 4645 0 दत्तेभ्यः .
SFX 2728 Y 1
SFX 2728 0 अणीयः .
SFX 968 Y 1
SFX 968 0 नीयायाः .
SFX 4727 Y 1
SFX 4727 0 वृत्त्या .
SFX 2566 Y 1
SFX 2566 0 अयिष्यन्तीभिः .
SFX 1390 Y 1
SFX 1390 0 तवताम् .
SFX 3889 Y 1
SFX 3889 0 प्रकाशान् .
SFX 3887 Y 1
SFX 3887 0 प्रकाशात् .
SFX 1086 Y 1
SFX 1086 0 आमः .
SFX 3344 Y 1
SFX 3344 0 वाम् .
SFX 187 Y 1
SFX 187 0 वान् .
SFX 2475 Y 1
SFX 2475 0 वात् .
SFX 2206 Y 1
SFX 2206 0 ष्यमाणस्य .
SFX 4854 Y 1
SFX 4854 0 रसम् .
SFX 4943 Y 1
SFX 4943 0 रसौ .
SFX 3743 Y 1
SFX 3743 0 प्रयोगाय .
SFX 2079 Y 1
SFX 2079 0 ष्यद्भ्याम् .
SFX 4835 Y 1
SFX 4835 0 गतेषु .
SFX 736 Y 1
SFX 736 0 व्याभ्यः .
SFX 1831 Y 1
SFX 1831 0 णीयस्य .
SFX 1798 Y 1
SFX 1798 0 मयाभ्याम् .
SFX 1438 Y 1
SFX 1438 0 तवतीषु .
SFX 4892 Y 1
SFX 4892 0 स्थानेभ्यः .
SFX 536 Y 1
SFX 536 0 यामहै .
SFX 2726 Y 1
SFX 2726 0 अणीयैः .
SFX 4868 Y 1
SFX 4868 0 दानम् .
SFX 2660 Y 1
SFX 2660 0 पतिभिः .
SFX 3174 Y 1
SFX 3174 0 अमाणतः .
SFX 2784 Y 1
SFX 2784 0 भावस्य .
SFX 85 Y 1
SFX 85 0 नः .
SFX 4157 Y 1
SFX 4157 0 अत्याम् .
SFX 4511 Y 1
SFX 4511 0 पालैः .
SFX 2050 Y 1
SFX 2050 0 यिष्यमाणाभिः .
SFX 8 Y 1
SFX 8 0 स्य .
SFX 4617 Y 1
SFX 4617 0 स्ये .
SFX 2940 Y 1
SFX 2940 0 अणीयाम् .
SFX 2724 Y 1
SFX 2724 0 अणीयान् .
SFX 2721 Y 1
SFX 2721 0 अणीयात् .
SFX 2411 Y 1
SFX 2411 0 अयताम् .
SFX 4426 Y 1
SFX 4426 0 भाय .
SFX 914 Y 1
SFX 914 0 माणाः .
SFX 102 Y 1
SFX 102 0 त्याः .
SFX 2570 Y 1
SFX 2570 0 अयिष्यन्तम् .
SFX 2569 Y 1
SFX 2569 0 अयिष्यन्तौ .
SFX 1144 Y 1
SFX 1144 0 इतानि .
SFX 3389 Y 1
SFX 3389 0 पद्धत्योः .
SFX 3149 Y 1
SFX 3149 0 मुख .
SFX 3262 Y 1
SFX 3262 0 मुखे .
SFX 3991 Y 1
SFX 3991 0 ल्योः .
SFX 2274 Y 1
SFX 2274 0 शाय .
SFX 201 Y 1
SFX 201 0 वद्भिः .
SFX 1709 Y 1
SFX 1709 0 मयः .
SFX 2965 Y 1
SFX 2965 0 विधिना .
SFX 3510 Y 1
SFX 3510 0 तमाः .
SFX 1260 Y 1
SFX 1260 0 नीभ्याम् .
SFX 651 Y 1
SFX 651 0 व्यम् .
SFX 640 Y 1
SFX 640 0 व्यौ .
SFX 2927 Y 1
SFX 2927 0 तृषु .
SFX 2634 Y 1
SFX 2634 0 अयिष्यमाणम् .
SFX 2625 Y 1
SFX 2625 0 अयिष्यमाणौ .
SFX 3727 Y 1
SFX 3727 0 त्रम् .
SFX 1680 Y 1
SFX 1680 0 यन्ती .
SFX 4781 Y 1
SFX 4781 0 टीका .
SFX 1415 Y 1
SFX 1415 0 तिः .
SFX 760 Y 1
SFX 760 0 यमानाः .
SFX 2777 Y 1
SFX 2777 0 भावाः .
SFX 3938 Y 1
SFX 3938 0 स्थाः .
SFX 4158 Y 1
SFX 4158 0 अतयोः .
SFX 2711 Y 1
SFX 2711 0 अयामहै .
SFX 1434 Y 1
SFX 1434 0 तवत्यै .
SFX 1432 Y 1
SFX 1432 0 तवत्यौ .
SFX 1850 Y 1
SFX 1850 0 ण्योः .
SFX 430 Y 1
SFX 430 0 न्त्याम् .
SFX 2374 Y 1
SFX 2374 0 करान् .
SFX 2357 Y 1
SFX 2357 0 करात् .
SFX 3837 Y 1
SFX 3837 0 वृत्तिभ्यः .
SFX 4641 Y 1
SFX 4641 0 धीनाम् .
SFX 4412 Y 1
SFX 4412 0 वनस्य .
SFX 1377 Y 1
SFX 1377 0 इष्यामः .
SFX 2343 Y 1
SFX 2343 0 नं .
SFX 4793 Y 1
SFX 4793 0 मालया .
SFX 260 Y 1
SFX 260 0 एषु .
SFX 902 Y 1
SFX 902 0 माण .
SFX 900 Y 1
SFX 900 0 माणे .
SFX 4446 Y 1
SFX 4446 0 लक्षणेभ्यः .
SFX 4112 Y 1
SFX 4112 0 स्थस्य .
SFX 1824 Y 1
SFX 1824 0 णीययोः .
SFX 4238 Y 1
SFX 4238 0 धरान् .
SFX 4177 Y 1
SFX 4177 0 धरात् .
SFX 2128 Y 1
SFX 2128 0 ष्यावः .
SFX 3651 Y 1
SFX 3651 0 तमतः .
SFX 1167 Y 1
SFX 1167 0 ईयया .
SFX 198 Y 1
SFX 198 0 वत्सु .
SFX 3720 Y 1
SFX 3720 0 भूताय .
SFX 4885 Y 1
SFX 4885 0 वसु .
SFX 1084 Y 1
SFX 1084 0 ईयानाम् .
SFX 1914 Y 1
SFX 1914 0 अकतः .
SFX 3169 Y 1
SFX 3169 0 अमाणेभ्यः .
SFX 3140 Y 1
SFX 3140 0 गाभ्याम् .
SFX 1955 Y 1
SFX 1955 0 यितास्मि .
SFX 4054 Y 1
SFX 4054 0 र्मणः .
SFX 4745 Y 1
SFX 4745 0 ज्ञेभ्यः .
SFX 2803 Y 1
SFX 2803 0 कार .
SFX 3161 Y 1
SFX 3161 0 कारे .
SFX 4420 Y 1
SFX 4420 0 कारि .
SFX 3600 Y 1
SFX 3600 0 क्षाभ्याम् .
SFX 4283 Y 1
SFX 4283 0 नाथान् .
SFX 4280 Y 1
SFX 4280 0 नाथात् .
SFX 1987 Y 1
SFX 1987 0 यिष्यन्त्यै .
SFX 1985 Y 1
SFX 1985 0 यिष्यन्त्यौ .
SFX 503 Y 1
SFX 503 0 त्वानि .
SFX 2885 Y 1
SFX 2885 0 साराणाम् .
SFX 3202 Y 1
SFX 3202 0 अमाणायाः .
SFX 2356 Y 1
SFX 2356 0 कराय .
SFX 1436 Y 1
SFX 1436 0 तवत्यः .
SFX 3691 Y 1
SFX 3691 0 क्षाय .
SFX 1666 Y 1
SFX 1666 0 तव्येन .
SFX 3534 Y 1
SFX 3534 0 भावेन .
SFX 3227 Y 1
SFX 3227 0 कृताभ्याम् .
SFX 3388 Y 1
SFX 3388 0 राजस्य .
SFX 3077 Y 1
SFX 3077 0 तीर्थात् .
SFX 4395 Y 1
SFX 4395 0 अन्त्राय .
SFX 4735 Y 1
SFX 4735 0 रूपैः .
SFX 2495 Y 1
SFX 2495 0 अयितव्यया .
SFX 2648 Y 1
SFX 2648 0 अयिष्यसे .
SFX 2552 Y 1
SFX 2552 0 अयिष्यसि .
SFX 2223 Y 1
SFX 2223 0 ष्यमाणायाम् .
SFX 765 Y 1
SFX 765 0 णाय .
SFX 4778 Y 1
SFX 4778 0 वृत्त्याः .
SFX 4959 Y 1
SFX 4959 0 स्थानानि .
SFX 552 Y 1
SFX 552 0 आनानाम् .
SFX 2715 Y 1
SFX 2715 0 अणीयेभ्यः .
SFX 594 Y 1
SFX 594 0 अताम् .
SFX 2794 Y 1
SFX 2794 0 देव .
SFX 3353 Y 1
SFX 3353 0 देवे .
SFX 3439 Y 1
SFX 3439 0 साः .
SFX 3217 Y 1
SFX 3217 0 तरैः .
SFX 3722 Y 1
SFX 3722 0 भूतानाम् .
SFX 2880 Y 1
SFX 2880 0 अनतः .
SFX 1413 Y 1
SFX 1413 0 लाभ्याम् .
SFX 343 Y 1
SFX 343 0 मानाय .
SFX 1075 Y 1
SFX 1075 0 ईयस्य .
SFX 2901 Y 1
SFX 2901 0 अणीयानि .
SFX 2209 Y 1
SFX 2209 0 ष्यमाणम् .
SFX 2203 Y 1
SFX 2203 0 ष्यमाणौ .
SFX 4569 Y 1
SFX 4569 0 प्रियाभ्याम् .
SFX 785 Y 1
SFX 785 0 नीययोः .
SFX 1233 Y 1
SFX 1233 0 इतव्याय .
SFX 2703 Y 1
SFX 2703 0 मतोः .
SFX 2937 Y 1
SFX 2937 0 अणीयायाः .
SFX 1785 Y 1
SFX 1785 0 मान् .
SFX 2872 Y 1
SFX 2872 0 मात् .
SFX 4270 Y 1
SFX 4270 0 न्तस्य .
SFX 1135 Y 1
SFX 1135 0 अथ .
SFX 734 Y 1
SFX 734 0 व्यया .
SFX 202 Y 1
SFX 202 0 वते .
SFX 197 Y 1
SFX 197 0 वति .
SFX 2478 Y 1
SFX 2478 0 अयितास्मि .
SFX 511 Y 1
SFX 511 0 कासु .
SFX 3104 Y 1
SFX 3104 0 अयमानया .
SFX 655 Y 1
SFX 655 0 व्येभ्यः .
SFX 1694 Y 1
SFX 1694 0 यन्त्या .
SFX 1224 Y 1
SFX 1224 0 नीः .
SFX 2593 Y 1
SFX 2593 0 वोः .
SFX 768 Y 1
SFX 768 0 आणाम् .
SFX 1603 Y 1
SFX 1603 0 आणान् .
SFX 1588 Y 1
SFX 1588 0 आणात् .
SFX 3951 Y 1
SFX 3951 0 वादेषु .
SFX 482 Y 1
SFX 482 0 नानि .
SFX 138 Y 1
SFX 138 0 कैः .
SFX 2398 Y 1
SFX 2398 0 अयितव्यस्य .
SFX 2481 Y 1
SFX 2481 0 मता .
SFX 3848 Y 1
SFX 3848 0 मती .
SFX 3272 Y 1
SFX 3272 0 कारः .
SFX 733 Y 1
SFX 733 0 व्यायाः .
SFX 3204 Y 1
SFX 3204 0 अमाणासु .
SFX 164 Y 1
SFX 164 0 ईभिः .
SFX 3980 Y 1
SFX 3980 0 स्थम् .
SFX 3979 Y 1
SFX 3979 0 स्थौ .
SFX 2487 Y 1
SFX 2487 0 अयिष्यते .
SFX 2546 Y 1
SFX 2546 0 अयिष्यति .
SFX 1935 Y 1
SFX 1935 0 जेभ्यः .
SFX 4178 Y 1
SFX 4178 0 धरस्य .
SFX 212 Y 1
SFX 212 0 न्ताम् .
SFX 4271 Y 1
SFX 4271 0 न्तान् .
SFX 4269 Y 1
SFX 4269 0 न्तात् .
SFX 947 Y 1
SFX 947 0 माणायै .
SFX 4640 Y 1
SFX 4640 0 इत्रे .
SFX 4408 Y 1
SFX 4408 0 वनेन .
SFX 3638 Y 1
SFX 3638 0 करणस्य .
SFX 1624 Y 1
SFX 1624 0 अमानाय .
SFX 4909 Y 1
SFX 4909 0 रहस्ययोः .
